Missouri, session 2026, HB1715.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 620, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto four new sections, to
be known as sections 620.2022, 620.2024, 620.2026, and 620.2028, to read as follows:
620.2022. 1. Sections 620.2022 to 620.2028 shall be known and may be cited as
the "Workforce Housing Tax Incentives Program".
2. As used in sections 620.2022 to 620.2028, the following terms mean:
(1) "Brownfield site", an abandoned, idled, or underutilized property where
expansion or redevelopment is complicated by real or perceived environmental
contamination. A brownfield site includes property contiguous with the site on which
the property is located. A brownfield site does not include property that has been
placed, or is proposed for placement, on the national priorities list established under the
federal Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act, 42
U.S.C. Section 9601 et seq.;
(2) "Community", a small city, urban area, or county;
(3) "Department", the Missouri department of economic development;
(4) "Disaster recovery housing project", a qualified housing project located in a
county that is a declared state disaster as defined under section 190.275 or disaster area
as defined under section 184.805 and is eligible for Federal Emergency Management
Agency (FEMA) Individual Assistance program;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1715 2
(5) "Governing body", the board, the body, or the persons in whom the powers
of a political subdivision as a body corporate, or otherwise, are vested;
(6) "Grayfield site", a property meeting the following requirements:
(a) The property has been developed and has infrastructure in place but the
property’s current use is outdated or prevents a better or more efficient use of the
property. Such property includes vacant, blighted, obsolete, or otherwise underutilized
property; and
(b) The property’s improvements and infrastructure are at least twenty-five
years old and one or more of the following conditions exist:
a. Thirty percent or more of a building located on the property that is available
for occupancy has been vacant or unoccupied for twelve months or more;
b. The assessed value of the improvements on the property has decreased by
twenty-five percent or more;
c. The property is currently being used as a parking lot; or
d. The improvements on the property no longer exist;
(7) "Greenfield site", a site that does not meet the definition of a brownfield site
or grayfield site. A project proposed at a site located on previously undeveloped land or
agricultural land shall be presumed to be a greenfield site;
(8) "Housing business", a business that is a housing developer, housing
contractor, or nonprofit organization that completes a housing project in the state;
(9) "Housing project", a project located in this state meeting the requirements of
section 620.2024;
(10) "Multi-use building", a building whose street-level ground story is used for
a purpose other than residential, and whose upper story or stories are currently used
primarily for a residential purpose or will be used primarily for a residential purpose
after completion of the housing project associated with the building;
(11) "Program", the workforce housing tax incentives program administered
under sections 620.2022 to 620.2028;
(12) "Qualified rehabilitation project", a project for the rehabilitation of
property in this state that meets the following criteria:
(a) The property is at least one of the following:
a. Property listed on the National Register of Historic Places or eligible for such
listing;
b. Property designated as of historic significance to a district listed in the
National Register of Historic Places or eligible for such designation;
c. Property or district designated a local landmark by a city or county
ordinance; or

HB 1715 3
d. A barn constructed prior to 1937;
(b) The property meets the physical criteria and standards for rehabilitation
established by the department by rule. To the extent applicable, the physical standards
and criteria shall be consistent with the United States Secretary of the Interior’s
Standards for Rehabilitation; and
(c) The project has qualified rehabilitation expenditures that meet or exceed the
following:
a. In the case of commercial property, expenditures totaling at least fifty
thousand dollars or fifty percent of the assessed value of the property, excluding the
land, prior to rehabilitation, whichever is less; or
b. In the case of property other than commercial property including, but not
limited to, barns constructed prior to 1937, expenditures totaling at least twenty-five
thousand dollars or twenty-five percent of the assessed value, excluding the land, prior
to rehabilitation, whichever is less;
(13) "Qualifying new investment", costs that are directly related to the
acquisition, repair, rehabilitation, or redevelopment of a housing project in this state. A
qualifying new investment includes costs that are directly related to new construction of
dwelling units if the new construction occurs in a distressed workforce housing
community. The amount of costs that may be used to compute a qualifying new
investment shall not exceed the costs used for the first one hundred fifty thousand
dollars of value for each dwelling unit that is part of a housing project. A qualifying
new investment does not include the following:
(a) The portion of the total cost of a housing project that is financed by federal,
state, or local government tax credits, grants, forgivable loans, or other forms of
financial assistance that do not require repayment, excluding the tax incentives provided
under sections 620.2022 to 620.2028; or
(b) If a housing project includes the rehabilitation, repair, or redevelopment of
an existing multi-use building, the portion of the total acquisition costs of the multi-use
building, including a proportionate share of the total acquisition costs of the land upon
which the multi-use building is situated, that are attributable to the street-level ground
story that is used for a purpose that is other than residential;
(14) "Small city", a city or village that:
(a) Is not located wholly within one of the eight most populous counties in the
state as determined by the most recent decennial census; or
(b) If located wholly within one of the eight most populous counties as
determined by the most recent decennial census, meets both of the following:
a. Has two thousand five hundred or fewer inhabitants; and

HB 1715 4
b. Experienced less than thirty percentage points of population growth when
comparing the most recent decennial census to the decennial census immediately
preceding the most recent decennial census.

The term "small city" shall not include any city with more than four hundred thousand
inhabitants and located in more than one county;
(15) "Tax credit" or "tax credits", a credit or credits issued by the department
against the tax otherwise due under chapter 143 or 148, excluding withholding tax
imposed under sections 143.191 to 143.265;
100 (16) "Tax incentive", a state measure that is intended to encourage individuals
101 and businesses to spend moneys or save moneys by reducing the amount of tax that they
102 have to pay including, but not limited to, tax credits and refunds of sales and use tax
103 issued under this program;
104 (17) "Urban area":
105 (a) Any city or municipality, except for a small city, that is wholly located within
106 one of the eight most populous counties in the state as determined by the most recent
107 decennial census; or
108 (b) Any city with more than four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in
109 more than one county.
620.2024. 1. To receive workforce housing tax incentives under sections
620.2022 to 620.2028, a proposed housing project shall meet the following requirements:
(1) The housing project includes at least one of the following:
(a) Four or more single-family dwelling units, except for a housing project
located in a small city, then two or more single-family dwelling units;
(b) One or more multiple dwelling unit buildings, each containing three or more
individual dwelling units; or
(c) Two or more dwelling units located in the upper story of an existing multi-use
building;
(2) The housing project consists of any of the following:
(a) Rehabilitation, repair, or redevelopment at a brownfield or grayfield site that
results in new dwelling units;
(b) The rehabilitation, repair, or redevelopment of dilapidated dwelling units;
(c) The rehabilitation, repair, or redevelopment of dwelling units located in the
upper story of an existing multi-use building;
(d) For a housing project located in a small city that meets program
requirements under paragraph (a) of subdivision (1) of this subsection, development
at a greenfield site; or

HB 1715 5
(e) For a disaster recovery housing project as defined under section 620.2022,
development at a greenfield site;
(3) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subdivision, the average
dwelling unit cost shall not exceed the maximum amount established by the department
for each fiscal year for the applicable project type and project location. The department
shall establish the maximum average dwelling unit cost for a housing project that
includes single-family dwelling units that are located in a small city and for a housing
project that includes single-family dwelling units that are located in an urban area. The
department shall establish the maximum average dwelling unit cost for a housing
project that includes multiple dwelling unit buildings and is located in a small city and
for a housing project that includes multiple dwelling unit buildings and is located in an
urban area. In establishing each maximum average dwelling unit cost, the department
shall primarily consider the most recent annual United States Census Bureau Building
Permits Survey and historical program data;
(b) If the housing project involves the rehabilitation, repair, redevelopment, or
preservation of property described in subdivision (12) of subsection 2 of section
620.2022, the average dwelling unit cost shall not exceed one hundred twenty-five
percent of the maximum average dwelling unit cost established by the department for
the applicable housing project type and housing project location as provided in
paragraph (a) of this subdivision; and
(4) The dwelling units, when completed and made available for occupancy, meet
the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development’s housing quality
standards as set forth in 24 CFR 982 and all applicable local safety standards.
620.2026. 1. (1) A housing business seeking workforce housing tax incentives
provided under section 620.2028 shall apply to the department in the manner prescribed
by the department's rules. The department may accept applications during one or more
annual application periods to be determined by the department by rule.
(2) The application shall include the following:
(a) Information establishing local participation in the housing project, including:
a. A resolution in support of the housing project by the governing body of the
community where the housing project will be located; and
b. Documentation of local matching funds pledged for the housing project in an
amount equal to at least one thousand dollars per dwelling unit including, but not
limited to, a funding agreement between the housing business and the governing body of
the community where the housing project will be located. For purposes of this
subparagraph, local matching funds shall be in the form of cash or cash equivalents or
in the form of a local property tax exemption, rebate, refund, or reimbursement;

HB 1715 6
(b) Information evidencing an agreement between the business and the
department specifying the requirements that will be met to confirm eligibility and the
requirements shall be maintained throughout the period of the agreement in order to
retain the incentives or financial assistance received. The department shall consult with
the governing body of the community during negotiations relating to the agreement.
The agreement shall contain a report submitted to the department by a business,
together with its application, describing all violations of environmental law or worker
safety law within the last five years. If, upon review of the application, the department
finds that the business has a record of violations of the law, statutes, rules, or regulations
that tend to show a consistent pattern, the department shall not provide incentives or
assistance to the business unless the department finds either that the violations did not
seriously affect public health, public safety, or the environment, or if such violations did
seriously affect public health, public safety, or the environment, that mitigating
circumstances were present;
(c) Information showing the total costs and funding sources of the housing
project sufficient to allow the department to adequately determine the financing that
will be utilized for the housing project, the actual cost of the dwelling units, and the
amount of the qualifying new investment; and
(d) Any other information deemed necessary by the department to evaluate the
eligibility and financial need of the housing project under the program.

In addition to complying with the applicable requirements under this subdivision, a
housing business applying for disaster recovery housing project tax incentives shall also
submit a certification that the applicant’s housing project meets the definition of a
disaster recovery housing project, if applicable. The housing business shall also submit
documentation that provides evidence that the qualified disaster recovery housing
project is needed due to the impact of the disaster that is the subject of the major
disaster declaration.
2. (1) All completed applications shall be reviewed and scored on a competitive
basis by the department under rules adopted by the department.
(2) Upon review and scoring of all applications received during an application
period, the department may make a tax incentive award to a housing project, which tax
incentive award shall represent the maximum amount of tax incentives the housing
project may qualify for under the program. In determining a tax incentive award, the
department shall not use an amount of housing project costs that exceeds the amount
included in the application of the housing business. Tax incentive awards shall be
approved by the director of the department.

HB 1715 7
(3) After making a tax incentive award, the department shall notify the housing
business of its tax incentive award. The notification shall include the amount of tax
incentives awarded under section 620.2028 and a statement that the housing business
has no right to receive a tax incentive certificate or claim a tax incentive until all
requirements of the program, including all requirements imposed by the agreement
entered into under subsection 3 of this section, are satisfied. The amount of tax credits
included on a tax credit certificate issued under this section, or a claim for refund of
sales and use taxes, shall be contingent upon completion of the requirements under
subsection 3 of this section.
(4) An applicant that does not receive a tax incentive award during an
application period may make additional applications during subsequent application
periods. Such applicant shall be required to submit a new application, which shall be
competitively reviewed and scored in the same manner as other applications in that
application period.
3. (1) Upon receipt of a tax incentive award for the housing project, the housing
business shall enter into an agreement with the department for the successful
completion of all requirements of the program. The agreement shall identify the tax
incentive award amount, the tax incentive award date, the housing project completion
deadline, and the total costs of the housing project.
(2) The following compliance cost fees shall apply to all agreements entered into
under this program and shall be collected in a manner determined by the department:
(a) The imposition of a one-time compliance cost fee of five hundred dollars to be
collected by the authority prior to the issuance of a tax incentive certificate or the
disbursement of financial assistance; and
(b) The imposition of a compliance cost fee equal to one-half of one percent of
the value of tax incentives claimed under an agreement that has an aggregate tax
incentive value of one hundred thousand dollars or greater. The department shall
collect the fee from the business after the tax incentive is claimed by the business from
the department of revenue.
(3) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subdivision, a housing
business shall complete its housing project within three years from the date the housing
project is registered by the department.
(b) The department may, for good cause within its discretion, extend a housing
project’s completion deadline by up to twelve months upon application by the housing
business. Such application shall be made prior to the expiration of the three-year
completion deadline in paragraph (a) of this subdivision. The department may approve
a second extension of up to twelve months if prior to the expiration of the first twelve-

HB 1715 8
month extension the housing business applies and substantiates to the satisfaction of the
department that the second extension is warranted due to extenuating circumstances
outside the control of the housing business. The department may determine what
qualifies as good cause and establish by rule the extenuating circumstances that will
qualify for approval and any additional information that the department may require
for approval of such extension. Applications by a housing business shall be made in the
manner and form prescribed by the department by rule.
(4) Upon completion of a housing project, a housing business shall submit the
following to the department:
(a) An examination of the housing project in accordance with the American
Institute of Certified Public Accountants’ Statements on Standards for Attestation
100 Engagements, completed by a certified public accountant authorized to practice in this
101 state;
102 (b) A statement of the final amount of the qualifying new investment for the
103 housing project; and
104 (c) Any information the department deems necessary to ensure compliance with
105 the agreement signed by the housing business under paragraph (a), the requirements of
106 this program, and rules the department and the department of revenue adopt under
107 subsection 4 of section 620.2028.
108 (5) (a) Upon review of the examination, verification of the amount of the
109 qualifying new investment, and review of any other information submitted under
110 paragraph (c) of subdivision (4) of this subsection, the department shall notify the
111 housing business of the amount that the housing business may claim as a refund of the
112 sales and use tax under subsection 2 of section 620.2028 and shall issue a tax credit
113 certificate to the housing business stating the amount of workforce housing investment
114 tax credits under subsection 3 of section 620.2028 the eligible housing business may
115 claim. The sum of the amount that the housing business may claim as a refund of the
116 sales and use tax and the amount of the tax credit certificate shall not exceed the total
117 amount of the tax incentive award.
118 (b) If upon review of the examination in paragraph (a) of subdivision (4) of this
119 subsection the department determines that a housing project has incurred project costs
120 in excess of the amount submitted in the application made under subsection 1 of this
121 section and identified in the agreement, the department shall do one of the following:
122 a. If the housing project costs do not cause the housing project’s average
123 dwelling unit cost to exceed the applicable maximum amount authorized under
124 subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section 620.2024, the department shall consider the
125 agreement fulfilled and shall issue a tax credit certificate;

HB 1715 9
126 b. If the housing project costs cause the housing project’s average dwelling unit
127 cost to exceed the applicable maximum amount authorized under subdivision (3) of
128 subsection 1 of section 620.2024 but do not cause the average dwelling unit cost to
129 exceed one hundred fifty percent of such applicable maximum amount, the department
130 shall consider the agreement fulfilled and shall issue a tax credit certificate. In such
131 case, the department shall reduce the tax incentive award and the corresponding
132 amount of tax incentives the eligible housing project shall claim under subsections 2 and
133 3 of section 620.2028 by the same percentage that the housing project’s average dwelling
134 unit cost exceeds the applicable maximum amount under subdivision (3) of subsection 1
135 of section 620.2024, and such tax incentive reduction shall be reflected on the tax credit
136 certificate. If the department issues a certificate under this subparagraph, the
137 department of revenue shall accept the certificate notwithstanding that the housing
138 project’s average dwelling unit costs exceed the maximum amount specified in
139 subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section 620.2024; or
140 c. If the housing project costs cause the housing project’s average dwelling unit
141 cost to exceed one hundred fifty percent of the applicable maximum amount authorized
142 under subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section 620.2024, the department shall
143 determine the eligible housing business to be in default under the agreement, shall
144 revoke the tax incentive award, and shall not issue a tax credit certificate. The housing
145 business shall not be allowed a refund of sales and use tax under subsection 2 of section
146 620.2028.
147 (6) The maximum aggregate amount of tax incentives that may be awarded and
148 issued under section 620.2028 to a housing business for a housing project shall not
149 exceed one million dollars.
150 (7) If a housing business qualifies for a higher amount of tax incentives under
151 section 620.2028 than is allowed by the limitation imposed under subdivision (4) of this
152 subsection, the department and the housing business may negotiate an apportionment of
153 the reduction in tax incentives between the sales tax refund provided in subsection 2 of
154 section 620.2028 and the workforce housing investment tax credits provided in
155 subsection 3 of section 620.2028, provided the total aggregate amount of tax incentives
156 after the apportioned reduction does not exceed the amount under subdivision (4) of this
157 subsection.
158 (8) The department shall issue tax incentives under the program on a first-come,
159 first-served basis until the maximum amount of tax incentives allocated under
160 subdivision (4) of subsection 5 of this section is reached. The department shall
161 maintain a list of housing projects registered prior to January 1, 2027, and of housing
162 projects awarded tax incentives on or after January 1, 2027, so that if the maximum

HB 1715 10
163 aggregate amount of tax incentives is reached in a given fiscal year, such registered
164 housing projects that were completed but for which tax incentives were not issued, and
165 such housing projects that were completed and are awarded tax incentives but for which
166 tax incentives have not been issued, shall be placed on a wait list in the order the housing
167 projects were registered or awarded tax incentives and shall be given priority for
168 receiving tax incentives in succeeding fiscal years.
169 4. (1) The failure by a housing business in completing a housing project to
170 comply with any requirement of this program or any of the terms and obligations of an
171 agreement entered into under this section may result in the revocation, reduction,
172 termination, or rescission of the tax incentive award or the approved tax incentives and
173 may subject the housing business to the repayment or recapture of tax incentives
174 claimed under section 620.2028.
175 (2) If the housing business does not meet any of the requirements of this
176 subsection or the resulting agreement, the tax incentives provided under this section
177 shall be repaid or recaptured. The repayment of incentives under this subsection shall
178 be considered a tax payment due and payable to the department of revenue by any
179 taxpayer who has claimed such incentives, and the failure to make such a repayment
180 may be treated by the department of revenue in the same manner as a failure to pay the
181 tax shown due or required to be shown due with the filing of a return or deposit form.
182 In addition, the county shall have the authority to take action to recover the value of
183 property taxes not collected as a result of the exemption provided to the business under
184 this program.
185 5. (1) Notwithstanding subsection 1 of this section, the department may establish
186 a disaster recovery housing project application period following the declaration of a
187 major disaster for a disaster area in Missouri.
188 (2) Upon review and scoring of all applications received during a disaster
189 recovery application period, the department may make a tax incentive award to a
190 disaster recovery housing project. The tax incentive award shall represent the
191 maximum amount of tax incentives that the disaster recovery housing project may
192 qualify for under the program. In determining a tax incentive award, the department
193 shall not use an amount of housing project costs that exceeds the amount included in the
194 application of the housing business. Tax incentive awards shall be approved by the
195 director of the department.
196 (3) The department shall issue tax incentives under the program for disaster
197 recovery housing projects on a first-come, first-served basis until the maximum amount
198 of tax incentives is allocated. The aggregate cap for all tax incentives issued for disaster
199 recovery housing projects under this program shall be thirty-five million dollars. Of the

HB 1715 11
200 moneys allocated to disaster recovery housing projects, seventeen million five hundred
201 thousand dollars shall be reserved for allocation to qualified housing projects in small
202 cities.
203 (4) All other housing projects under this program that are not disaster recovery
204 housing projects shall be subject to a thirty-five million dollar cap.
620.2028. 1. A housing business that has entered into an agreement under
section 620.2026 is eligible to receive the tax incentives described in subsections 2 and 3
of this section.
2. (1) A housing business may claim a refund of the sales and use taxes paid
under chapter 144 prior to the completion of the housing project that are directly
related to a housing project and specified in the agreement.
(2) To receive a refund, a claim shall be filed by the housing business with the
department of revenue as follows:
(a) The contractor or subcontractor shall state under oath, on forms provided by
the department of revenue, the amount of sales and use taxes paid under chapter 144
prior to the completion of the housing project that are directly related to a housing
project and specified in the agreement;
(b) The contractor or subcontractor shall file the forms with the housing
business before final settlement is made; and
(c) a. The housing business shall, after the agreement completion date, apply to
the department of revenue for any refund of the amount of sales and use taxes paid
under chapter 144 prior to the completion of the housing project that were directly
related to a housing project and specified in the agreement. The application shall be
made in the manner and upon forms to be provided by the department of revenue. The
department of revenue shall audit the claim and, if approved, issue a refund to the
housing business. The application shall be made within one year after the agreement
completion date. A claim filed by the housing business in accordance with this
subsection shall not be denied by reason of a limitation provision set forth in chapter 143
or 144; and
b. For purposes of this paragraph, "agreement completion date" means the date
on which the department notifies the department of revenue that all applicable
requirements of the agreement entered into under subdivision (1) of subsection 3 of
section 620.2026, and all applicable requirements of this program, including the rules
the department and the department of revenue adopt under subsection 4 of this section
are satisfied.


HB 1715 12
A contractor or subcontractor who willfully makes a false claim under oath in violation
of the provisions of this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, in addition to
any other penalty, the contractor or subcontractor shall be liable for the payment of the
tax and any applicable penalty and interest.
3. (1) For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, a housing business
may claim a tax credit in an amount not to exceed the following:
(a) For a housing project located in an urban area, ten percent of the qualifying
new investment of a housing project specified in the agreement;
(b) For a housing project located in a small city, twenty percent of the qualifying
new investment of a housing project specified in the agreement; and
(c) For a disaster recovery housing project, twenty percent of the qualifying new
investment of a housing project specified in the agreement.
(2) An individual who is part of the housing business may claim a tax credit
under this subsection from a partnership, limited liability company, S corporation,
estate, or trust electing to have income taxed directly to the individual. The amount
claimed by the individual shall be based upon the pro rata share of the individual’s
earnings from the partnership, limited liability company, S corporation, estate, or trust.
(3) Any tax credit in excess of the housing business or individual taxpayer’s
liability for the tax year is not refundable but may be credited to the tax liability for the
following five years or until depleted, whichever is earlier.
(4) (a) To claim a tax credit under this subsection, a taxpayer shall include one
or more tax credit certificates with the taxpayer’s tax return.
(b) The tax credit certificate shall contain the taxpayer’s name, address, tax
identification number, the amount of the credit, the name of the eligible housing
business, any other information required by the department of revenue, and a place for
the name and tax identification number of a transferee and the amount of the tax credit
being transferred, if applicable.
(c) The tax credit certificate, unless rescinded by the department, shall be
accepted by the department of revenue as payment for taxes for all tax years beginning
on or after January 1, 2027, subject to any conditions or restrictions placed by the
department upon the face of the tax credit certificate and subject to the limitations of
this program.
(d) Tax credit certificates issued under subdivision (5) of subsection 3 of section
620.2026 may be transferred to any person. Within ninety days of transfer, the
transferee shall submit the transferred tax credit certificate to the department of
revenue along with a statement containing the transferee’s name, tax identification
number, and address; the denomination that each replacement tax credit certificate is to

HB 1715 13
carry; and any other information required by the department of revenue. However, tax
credit certificate amounts of less than the minimum amount established by rule of the
department shall not be transferable.
(e) Within thirty days of receiving the transferred tax credit certificate and the
transferee’s statement, the department of revenue shall issue one or more replacement
tax credit certificates to the transferee. Each replacement tax credit certificate shall
contain the information required for the original tax credit certificate and shall have the
same expiration date that appeared on the transferred tax credit certificate.
(f) A tax credit shall not be claimed by a transferee under this section until a
replacement tax credit certificate identifying the transferee as the proper holder has
been issued. The transferee may use the amount of the tax credit transferred against the
transferee taxpayer's state tax liability for all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2027, under the same terms and conditions that the transferor was allowed. Any
consideration received for the transfer of the tax credit shall not be included as income
under chapter 143. Any consideration paid for the transfer of the tax credit shall not be
deducted from income under chapter 143.
(5) For purposes of the individual and corporate income taxes and the franchise
tax, the increase in the basis of the property that would otherwise result from the
qualifying new investment shall be reduced by the amount of the tax credit computed
under this subsection.
(6) Notwithstanding any provision of section 105.1500 to the contrary, any
requirement to provide information, documents, or records under this section, and any
requirement established by the department to provide information, documents, or
records for the purpose of administering and enforcing this section, shall be exempt
from section 105.1500.
4. The department of economic development and the department of revenue may
promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the administration of this section.
Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
100 with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date,
101 or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant
102 of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall
103 be invalid and void.
104 5. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:

HB 1715 14
105 (1) The provisions of the new program authorized under sections 620.2022 to
106 620.2028 shall automatically sunset on December thirty-first, six years after the effective
107 date of sections 620.2022 to 620.2028 unless reauthorized by an act of the general
108 assembly;
109 (2) Sections 620.2022 to 620.2028 shall terminate on September first of the
110 calendar year immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized
111 under sections 620.2022 to 620.2028 is sunset; and
112 (3) Nothing in this subsection shall prevent a taxpayer from claiming a tax credit
113 properly issued before this program was sunset in a tax year after the program is sunset.
✔